Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.600

School district bonds—Redemption of by school district to continue though facility under control of college district board.

Whenever a common school board has contracted to redeem general obligation bonds used for the construction or acquisition of facilities which are now to be under the administration, control and occupancy of the college district board, the common school board shall continue to redeem the bonds in accordance with the provisions of the bonds.

[ 1991 c 238 s 60; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.600. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 60. Formerly RCW 28.85.600.]